Utah statutes.
13-1-8.   Annual report.

The department shall prepare and submit to the governor and the Legislature by October 1 of each year an annual report of the operation, activities and goals of the department, its divisions, and agencies for the preceding fiscal year.



Enacted by Chapter 322, 1983 General Session

